Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
In General

§ 53-3-1.
Definitions for certain sections.

Unless the context otherwise requires, words and terms appearing in Sections 53-3-3 through 53-3-21, inclusive, shall have the meaning attributed to them in Section 53-1-3.

HISTORY:
No history available for this section.

§ 53-3-3.
Waste unlawful.

Waste of oil or gas as defined in Section 53-1-3 is hereby made unlawful.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-09; Laws, 1932, ch. 117; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 5.

§ 53-3-5.
Drilling and production regulated.

The state oil and gas board shall have the power and authority and it shall be its duty, after due notice and a hearing, to regulate the drilling and location of wells in any pool and the production therefrom so as to prevent reasonably avoidable net drainage from each developed unit (that is, drainage which is not equalized by counterdrainage) so that each owner in a pool shall have the right and opportunity to recover his fair and equitable share of the recoverable oil and gas in such pool.

For the prevention of waste, to protect and enforce the correlative rights of the owners in a pool, and to avoid the augmenting and accumulation of risks arising from the drilling of an excessive number of wells, or the reduced recovery which might result from too small a number of wells, the board shall, after a hearing, establish a drilling unit or units for each pool. The establishment of a unit for gas shall be limited and apply only to the production of gas and not oil.

Each well permitted to be drilled upon any drilling unit shall be drilled in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the board and in accordance with a spacing pattern fixed by the board for the pool in which the well is located with such exceptions as may be reasonably necessary where it is shown, after notice and upon hearing, that the unit is partly outside the pool or, for some other reason, a well otherwise located on the unit would be nonproductive, or topographical conditions are such as to make the drilling at such location unduly burdensome. Whenever an exception is granted, the board shall take such action as will offset any advantage which the person securing the exception may have over other producers by reason of the drilling of the well as an exception, but no well drilled and completed as an exception to prescribed footage limitations for the reason that a portion of the drilling unit upon which such well is located is partly outside the pool or productive horizon shall be allocated a reduced daily production allowable whenever it shall be demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board that the productive acreage underlying such drilling unit is equal to, or more than, the reasonable minimum amount of productive acreage which would underlie such drilling unit under the minimum conditions which would permit the drilling of a well thereon so located as to comply with all applicable footage limitations. Each well drilled and completed as an exception to prescribed footage limitations for the reason that a portion of such drilling unit is partly outside the pool or productive horizon shall be allocated a reduced daily production allowable whenever it cannot be demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board that the productive acreage underlying such drilling unit is equal to, or more than, the minimum amount of productive acreage which would underlie such drilling unit under the minimum conditions which would permit the drilling of a well thereon so located as to comply with all applicable footage limitations. Such reduced allowable shall be allocated in proportion to the relationship which the productive acreage, as determined by the board, bears to the reasonable minimum amount of productive acreage which would underlie such drilling unit under the minimum conditions which would permit the drilling of a well thereon so located as to comply with all footage limitations applicable to such drilling unit. The reasonable minimum amount of productive acreage shall be determined for all purposes as if each oil well drilling unit were a regular governmental quarter-quarter section, comprising forty acres, more or less, and as if each gas well drilling unit were a regular governmental one half section, comprising three hundred twenty acres, more or less, and shall be calculated for the purpose of each oil well drilling unit as being the total acreage which would be encompassed within a triangular shaped area bounded on two sides by the exterior boundaries of such forty-acre drilling unit meeting at a 90° angle corner and on the third side by a straight line running on a 45° angle through a location point situated at the minimum distance out of such corner as shall be in accordance with prescribed oil well drilling unit footage limitations and intersecting each of such two exterior boundaries at 45° angles, and shall be calculated for the purposes of each gas well drilling unit as being the total acreage which would be encompassed within a triangular shaped area bounded on two sides by the exterior boundaries of such three hundred twenty-acre drilling unit meeting at a 90° angle corner and on the third side by a straight line running on a 45° angle through a location point situated at the minimum distance out of such corner as shall be in accordance with prescribed gas well drilling unit footage limitations and intersecting each of such two exterior boundaries at 45° angles. Should drilling units for any field or area be established so as to permit the drilling of oil or gas wells on smaller or larger units than 40 acre or 320 acre drilling units then, in such event, the same method of determining the reasonable minimum amount of productive acreage shall be applied to the consideration of such oil or gas drilling units with respect to the size of, and the prescribed footage limitations applicable to, such drilling units.

Except where otherwise provided, any allocation or apportionment of production shall be made on the basis of and in proportion to the surface acreage content of the drilling units prescribed for the producing horizons for the pools so that each such prescribed unit shall have equal opportunity to produce the same daily allowable, and any special unit of less than the prescribed amount of surface acreage shall be allowed to produce only in the proportion that the surface acreage content of any such special unit bears to the surface acreage content of the regular prescribed unit. In the event any well in attempting to make its allowable should be operated in a way that would commit waste as herein defined, or to the detriment of the field as a whole, the allowable for any such well shall be subject to adjustment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-21; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 9; Laws, 1956, ch. 164, § 1.

§ 53-3-7.
Integration of interests; pooling agreements and orders.

When two (2) or more separately owned tracts of land are embraced within an established drilling unit or when there are separately owned interests in all or part of an established drilling unit the persons owning the drilling rights therein and the rights to share in the production therefrom may validly agree to integrate their interests and to develop their lands as a drilling unit. Where, however, such persons have not agreed to integrate their interests the board may, for the prevention of waste or to avoid the drilling of unnecessary wells, require such persons to integrate their interests and to develop their lands as a drilling unit. All orders requiring such pooling shall be made after notice and hearing, and shall be upon terms and conditions that are just and reasonable, and will afford to the owner of each tract the opportunity to recover or receive his just and equitable share of the oil and gas in the pool without unnecessary expense.

The portion of the production allocated to the owner of each tract included in a drilling unit formed by a pooling order shall, when produced, be considered as if it had been produced from such tract by a well drilled thereon.

Except as otherwise provided for in this section, in the event such pooling is required, the cost of development and operation of the pooled unit chargeable by the operator to the other interested owner or owners shall be limited to the actual expenditures required for such purpose not in excess of what are reasonable including a reasonable charge for supervision. In the event that the operator elects to proceed under the provisions of this subsection (1)(b), and does not elect to seek alternate charges as provided for in this section, the notice procedure followed shall be in accordance with Section 53-1-21, Mississippi Code of 1972.

For the purposes of this section, as to a drilling unit, the term “nonconsenting owner” shall mean an owner of drilling rights which the owner has not agreed, in writing, to integrate in the drilling unit. The owner may own other drilling rights in the unit which the owner has agreed, in writing, to integrate in the unit and thereby also be a “consenting owner” as to the interest which the owner has agreed to integrate in the unit.

In the event that one or more owners owning not less than thirty-three percent (33%) of the drilling rights in a drilling unit voluntarily consent to the drilling of a unit well thereon, and the operator has made a good faith effort to (i) negotiate with each nonconsenting owner to have said owner’s interest voluntarily integrated into the unit, (ii) notify each nonconsenting owner of the names of all owners of drilling rights who have agreed to integrate any interests in the unit, (iii) ascertain the address of each nonconsenting owner, (iv) give each nonconsenting owner written notice of the proposed operation, specifying the work to be performed, the location, proposed depth, objective formation and the estimated cost of the proposed operation, and (v) offer each nonconsenting owner the opportunity to lease or farm out on reasonable terms or to participate in the cost and risk of developing and operating the unit well involved on reasonable terms, by agreeing in writing, then the operator may petition the board to allow it to charge alternate charges (alternate to and in lieu of the charges provided for in subsection (1)(b) of this section).

Any such petition on which alternate charges may be ordered by the board shall include a statement which shall name all nonconsenting real parties in interest in said proposed drilling unit, as of a date not more than ninety (90) days prior to the filing of the petition, giving each such person’s name, and address if known; and if any owner’s address is not known, the operator shall state in its petition that such person’s address is unknown after diligent search and inquiry. Only those parties served with actual or constructive notice as set forth hereinbelow will be subject to any alternate charges allowed by the board.

Upon the filing of a petition on which alternate charges may be ordered, the petitioner shall have prepared, and furnish to the board with said petition, a notice to each and all nonconsenting real parties in interest whose address is unknown, whether such person be a resident of the State of Mississippi or not, which the board shall have published, noticing each such person to appear before a regular meeting of the board sufficiently distant in time to allow thirty (30) days to elapse between the date of the last publication of said notice as hereinafter provided, and the date of the regular meeting of the board to which each such person is noticed. Said notice shall also notice all unknown heirs or devisees of deceased owners, if any there be, and all unknown persons owning drilling rights in said proposed drilling unit. The notice shall be substantially in the following form, to wit:

Click to view

The publication of notice to nonconsenting real parties in interest whose address is unknown after diligent search and inquiry shall be made once in each week during three (3) successive weeks in a public newspaper of the county or counties in which the proposed drilling unit is located, if there be such a newspaper. If there is not such a county newspaper, then the said publication of notice shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in the State of Mississippi. The period of publication shall be deemed to be completed at the end of twenty-one (21) days from the date of the first publication, provided there have been three (3) publications made as hereinabove required.

Upon the filing of a petition on which alternate charges may be ordered, the petitioner shall also have prepared, and shall furnish to the board, a notice which shall be substantially in the form set out above, to each nonconsenting real party in interest whose address is known, together with addressed and stamped envelopes, and the board shall mail each notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, sufficiently distant in time to allow thirty (30) days to elapse between the date of the mailing of said notice and the date of the regular meeting of the board at which said petition will be first scheduled to be heard.

Petitioner shall also advance to the board at the time of the filing of said petition the cost of publication and mailing of notices as set out above which shall be established by the board. Said costs of publication and mailing of notices shall be considered as part of the costs of operation which are chargeable to the nonconsenting owner’s nonconsenting share of production as set forth in paragraph (g) of this subsection (2).

In the event a pooling order is issued by the board, and any nonconsenting owner does not subsequently agree in writing as provided for herein, and if the operations on the existing or proposed well which are described in the pooling order are actually commenced within one (1) year after the pooling order is issued by the board, and thereafter with due diligence and without undue delay, the existing or proposed well is actually completed as a well capable of producing oil, gas and/or other minerals in quantities sufficient to yield a return in excess of monthly operating costs, then, subject to the limitations set out in this section, the operator and/or the appropriate consenting owners shall be entitled to receive as alternate charges (alternate to and in lieu of the charges provided for in subsection (1)(b) of this section; provided, however, that in no event shall the operator and/or the appropriate consenting owners be entitled to recover less than such charges provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section) the share of production from the well attributable to the nonconsenting owner’s nonconsenting interests in the unit established or subsequently reformed for production therefrom, until the point in time when the proceeds from the sale of such share, calculated at the well, or the market value thereof if such share is not sold, after deducting production and excise taxes, which operator will pay or cause to be paid, and the payment required by this paragraph (g) shall equal the sum of:

One hundred percent (100%) of the nonconsenting owner’s nonconsenting share of the cost of any newly acquired surface equipment beyond the wellhead connections including, but not limited to, stock tanks, separators, treaters, pumping equipment and piping; and

Two hundred fifty percent (250%) of that portion of the costs and expenses of the operations provided for in the pooling order, and two hundred fifty percent (250%) of that portion of the cost of newly acquired equipment in the well, including wellhead connections, which would have been chargeable to the nonconsenting owner’s nonconsenting share thereof; provided, however, when a mineral interest that is severed from the surface estate is owned by a nonconsenting owner or when a mineral interest is subject to an oil and gas lease that is owned by a nonconsenting owner, the payment under this subparagraph (ii) shall be three hundred percent (300%); and

One hundred percent (100%) of the nonconsenting owner’s nonconsenting share of the cost of operation of the well commencing with first production and continuing to such point in time.

Whenever a drilling unit established by a pooling order issued by the board under subsection (2) of this section is to be reformed or altered by the board for good cause, after notice and hearing, then the interest of any nonconsenting owner listed in the pooling order who received notice of the application to reform or alter the unit and had not agreed in writing as provided for herein shall remain subject to the charges set forth in this subsection (2)(g) with respect to its interest in the reformed or altered unit. If there is any nonconsenting owner within a proposed reformed or altered unit who has not been previously provided the information and offers set forth in subparagraphs (ii) through (v) of subsection (2)(a) of this section which was sent to the owners, and if the applicant for an order of reformation or alteration of such unit provides to the nonconsenting owner the information and offers set forth in subparagraphs (ii) through (v) of subsection (2)(a) of this section at the same time and in the same manner as such nonconsenting owners receive notice of the application to reform or alter the drilling unit, then the interest of any nonconsenting owner listed in the pooling order for the reformed or altered unit who does not agree in writing as provided for herein shall be subject to the charges set forth in this subsection (2)(g) with respect to its interest in the reformed or altered unit.

Whenever any one (1) operator has filed for alternate charges on two (2) drilling units, which units are direct, partially direct or diagonal offsets one to the other, such operator may not file a petition for alternate charges, as distinguished from the charges provided by subsection (1)(b), as to any additional units which are direct, partially direct or diagonal offsets to the said first two (2) units of that operator until said operator has drilled, tested and completed the first two (2) such wells, as wells capable of production or completed as dry holes or either, and has filed completion reports on said first two (2) wells with the board, or the permits for such well or wells have expired if one or both of them be not drilled.

The pooling order if issued shall provide that each nonconsenting owner shall be afforded the opportunity to participate in the development and operation of the well in the pooled unit as to all or any part of said owner’s interest on the same costs basis as the consenting owners by agreeing in writing to pay that part of the costs of such development and operation chargeable to said nonconsenting owner’s interest, or to enter into such other written agreement with the operator as the parties may contract, provided such acceptance in writing is filed with the board within twenty (20) days after the pooling order is filed for record with the board.

The pooling order shall provide that the well be drilled on a competitive contract, arms length, basis; provided, however, that the operator may employ its own tools or those of affiliates, but charges therefor shall not exceed the prevailing rates in the area.

Within sixty (60) days after the completion of any operation on which alternate charges have been ordered, the operator shall furnish any nonconsenting owner who may request same an inventory of the equipment in and connected to the well, and an itemized statement of the cost of drilling, deepening, plugging back, testing, completing and equipping the well for production; or, at its option, the operator, in lieu of an itemized statement of such costs of operation, may submit detailed monthly statements of said costs. Each month thereafter, during the time the operator and/or consenting parties are being reimbursed, the operator shall furnish any nonconsenting owner who may request same with an itemized statement of all costs and liabilities incurred in the operation of the well, together with a statement of the quantity of oil and gas produced from it and the amount of proceeds realized from the sale of the well’s production during the preceding month. Any amount realized from the sale or other disposition of equipment acquired in connection with any such operation which would have been owned by a nonconsenting owner had it participated therein as to its nonconsenting interest shall be credited against the total unreturned costs of the work done and of the equipment purchased in determining when the interest of such nonconsenting owner shall be owned by said nonconsenting owner as above provided; and if there is a credit balance, it shall be paid to such nonconsenting owner. From the point in time provided for in paragraph (g) of this subsection (2), each nonconsenting owner shall own the same interest in such well, the material and equipment in or pertaining thereto, and the production therefrom as such nonconsenting owner would have been entitled to had it participated in the drilling, reworking, deepening and/or plugging back of said well. Thereafter, except as otherwise provided in this section, the operator shall be entitled to charge each nonconsenting owner such nonconsenting owner’s proportionate part of all reasonable costs incurred by the operator in operating the unit well and the unit, including a reasonable charge for supervision, and in the event such nonconsenting owner fails to pay such proportionate share of such costs within thirty (30) days after receipt by the nonconsenting owner of a valid invoice, the operator shall be entitled to receive such nonconsenting owner’s share of production until such time as such unpaid share of costs shall have been recovered by the operator.

In the event that a leased interest is subject to an order of pooling and integration, and the operator and/or the appropriate consenting owners are entitled to alternate charges as provided by paragraph (g) of this subsection (2), and if there be no reasonable question as to good and merchantable title to the royalty interest, the lessor of said lease shall be paid, by the operator or purchaser of production, the proceeds attributable to said lessor’s contracted royalty, not to exceed an amount of three-sixteenths (3/16) of the proceeds attributable to the nonconsenting owner’s proportionate share of production. Nothing herein contained shall affect or diminish in any way the responsibility of the nonconsenting owner to account for the payment of any royalty or other payment, not paid as herein provided, which may burden or be attributable to the interest owned by such nonconsenting owner.

When production of oil or gas is not secured in paying quantities as a result of such integration or pooling of interests, there shall be no charge payable by the nonconsenting owner or owners as to such owner’s nonconsenting interest.

In the event of any dispute relative to costs, the board shall determine the proper costs, after due notice to all interested parties and a hearing thereon. Appeals may be taken from such determination as from any other order of the board.

The State Oil and Gas Board shall in all instances where a unit has been formed out of lands or areas of more than one (1) ownership, require the operator when so requested by an owner, to deliver to such owner or his assigns his proportionate share of the production from the well common to such drilling unit; but where necessary, such owner receiving same shall provide at his own expense proper receptacles for the receipt or storage of such oil, gas or distillate.

Should the persons owning the drilling or other rights in separate tracts embraced within a drilling unit fail to agree upon the integration of the tracts and the drilling of a well on the unit, and should it be established that the board is without authority to require integration as provided in this section, then, subject to all other applicable provisions of this chapter, and of Chapter 1 of this title, the owner of each tract embraced within the drilling unit may drill on his tract; but the allowable production from such tract shall be such proportion of the allowable production for the full drilling unit as the area of such separately owned tract bears to the full drilling unit.

The State Oil and Gas Board in order to prevent waste and avoid the drilling of unnecessary wells may permit (i) the cycling of gas in any pool or portion thereof or (ii) the introduction of gas or other substance into an oil or gas reservoir for the purpose of repressuring such reservoir, maintaining pressure or carrying on secondary recovery operations. The board shall permit the pooling or integration of separate tracts or separately owned interests when reasonably necessary in connection with such operations.

Agreements made in the interests of conservation of oil or gas, or both, or for the prevention of waste, between and among owners or operators, or both, owning separate holdings in the same field or pool or in any area that appears from geologic or other data to be underlaid by a common accumulation of oil or gas, or both, and agreements between and among such owners or operators, or both, and royalty owners therein, for the purpose of bringing about the development and operation of the field, pool or area, or any part thereof, as a unit, and for establishing and carrying out a plan for the cooperative development and operation thereof, when such agreements are approved by the board, are hereby authorized and shall not be held or construed to violate any of the statutes of this state relating to trusts, monopolies or contracts and combinations in restraint of trade.

NOTICE TO APPEAR BEFORE THE STATE OIL AND GAS BOARD You are noticed to appear before the State Oil and Gas Board at its regular term, being on the day of , 20 to show cause if you can why the petition of (Operator) being Petition No. in said board and seeking to force to integrate and pool all interests in (description of Unit by legal description)
should not be granted. To (inserting the name of such person or persons, whose address is unknown), and all such unknown heirs or devisees and all such unknown owners, whose names and addresses remain unknown after diligent search and inquiry. Said meeting of said board shall be held at (the then hearing room of said Oil and Gas Board) on the above date at .(the time) This day of , A.D.. supervisor

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-22; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 10; Laws, 1950, ch. 220, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 511, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 417; Laws, 2014, ch. 392, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 53-3-9.
Allowable production; meters.

Whenever the state oil and gas board has fixed for the purpose of preventing waste, as defined in Section 53-1-3, the total amount of oil or gas which may be produced in any pool in this state at an amount less than that amount which the pool can produce, the board shall allocate or apportion the allowable production among the producers in the pool on a reasonable basis so as to prevent reasonably avoidable drainage from each developed unit which is not equalized by counter-drainage, and so that each producer will have the opportunity to produce or receive his just and equitable share, as above set forth.

After the effective date of any rule, regulation, or order of the state oil and gas board fixing the allowable production of oil or gas, or both, for any pool, no person shall produce from any well, lease, or property more than the allowable production which is applicable; nor shall such amount be produced in a different manner than that which may be authorized.

The state oil and gas board shall require interested persons, firms or corporations to place uniform meters of a type approved by the board wherever the board may designate on all pipe lines, flow lines, gathering systems, barge terminals, loading racks, refineries, or other places deemed necessary or proper to prevent waste and the transportation of illegally produced oil or gas; such meters at all times shall be under the supervision and control of the board, and it shall be a violation of Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47, inclusive, and Sections 53-3-1 through 53-3-21, inclusive, for any person, firm or corporation to refuse to attach or install such meter when ordered to do so by the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-23; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 11.

§ 53-3-11.
Well drilling notice; permit; surety or cash bond for nonresidents; Secretary of State as service agent for nonresidents; taxpayer notice for new wells; board spacing pattern requirements.

Any person desiring or proposing to drill any well in search of oil or gas, before commencing the drilling of any such well, shall notify the oil and gas supervisor upon such form as the board may prescribe. The drilling of any well for oil or gas is hereby prohibited until such notice is given and a permit therefor is issued.

Before any nonresident not qualified to do business in this state is issued a permit pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, such nonresident shall file with the Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by him, a surety or cash bond in a sum of not less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or in a greater amount if so approved by the Secretary of State, conditioned that such sum be paid to the State of Mississippi for the benefit of all persons interested, their legal representatives, attorneys or assigns, in the event the operator of such well shall fail to reasonably restore the land and improvements of the surface estate as a result of mineral exploration and/or production, or in the event the operator shall fail to properly plug a dry or abandoned well in the manner prescribed by the rules of the board. Such bond shall be executed by the operator listed in the drilling permit and, in case of a surety bond, by a corporate surety licensed to do business in the State of Mississippi. Such bond shall cover all subsequent drilling permits issued to such nonresident operator and shall be for a term co-extensive with the terms of the permits.

The Secretary of State is hereby designated as the agent upon whom process may be served in any action against such nonresident operator to recover damages to the surface estate arising from mineral exploration and/or production. Any such action for damages shall be commenced within six (6) years next after the closing of the well.

A person issued a permit to drill an oil or gas well under this section is required to provide notice of the intended drill site location prior to commencing operations. The notice shall be sent by United States certified mail to the taxpayer shown on the most recent county ad valorem tax receipt available in the office of the tax collector of the county in which the well site is located, and shall be posted to the mailing address shown on that ad valorem tax receipt. The notice shall include a copy of the unit plat showing the proposed well location. The notification requirement of this subsection (3) shall apply only to permits to drill new wells and shall not apply to well reentries, recompletions or reworking operations on existing or previously permitted wells. Failure to give the notice provided for in this subsection (3) shall not invalidate the well permit.

The drilling of any well, which is not in accordance with a spacing pattern fixed by the board, is hereby prohibited until and unless a permit is issued by the board after notice and hearing.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-29; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 16; Laws, 1983, ch. 439; Laws, 1998, ch. 335, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 53-3-13.
Permit fee; disposition of fees.

Any person securing a permit to drill a well in search of oil or gas under the provisions of Section 53-3-11 shall pay to the Oil and Gas Supervisor a fee of Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) upon and for the issuance of the permit. A lesser sum may be paid if the State Oil and Gas Board shall adopt a rule fixing the amount to be paid at a sum less than Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00). Any such permit, when issued and the fee paid thereon, shall be good for a period of one (1) year from the date thereof; and in the event drilling has commenced within one (1) year, the permit shall be good for the life of the well commenced, unless during the course of drilling or production the operator is changed. In the event a change of operators from that listed in the drilling permit is desired, the operator listed and the proposed new operator shall apply to the State Oil and Gas Board for authority to change operators on forms to be prescribed by order of the State Oil and Gas Board. The fee for such change of operators shall be One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per change, or some lesser sum as may be fixed by order of the board.

The State Oil and Gas Supervisor, as ex officio Secretary of the State Oil and Gas Board, shall remit to the State Treasurer all monies collected by reason of the assessments made, fixed and authorized under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, and the State Treasurer shall deposit all such monies in a special fund known as the “Oil and Gas Conservation Fund.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-30; Laws, 1948, ch. 319, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1966, ch. 280, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 487; Laws, 1978, ch. 520, § 14; Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 31; Laws, 2007, ch. 363, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2019, ch. 474, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 2019).

§ 53-3-15.
Certificate of compliance required before connection with pipe lines; cancellation.

Owners or operators of oil or gas wells shall, before connecting with any oil or gas pipe line, secure from the state oil and gas board a certificate showing compliance with the conservation laws of the state and conservation rules, regulations and orders of the board. No operator of a pipe line shall connect with any well until the owner or operator of such well shall furnish a certificate from the board that such conservation laws and such rules, regulations and orders have been complied with. This section shall not prevent a temporary connection of not more than seven days’ duration with any well in order to take care of production and prevent waste until opportunity shall have been given the owner or operator of such well to secure such certificate.

The state oil and gas board shall have the power to cancel any certificate of compliance issued under the provisions of this section when it appears, after due notice and hearing, that the owner or operator of a well covered by the provisions of same has violated or is violating, in connection with the operation of said well or the production of oil or gas therefrom, any of the oil or gas conservation laws of this state or any of the rules, regulations or orders of the board promulgated thereunder. Upon notice from the board to the operator of any pipe line connected to any such oil or gas well that the certificate of compliance with reference to such well has been cancelled by the board, the operator of such pipe line shall disconnect from such well and it shall be unlawful for the operator of such pipe line to transport oil or gas therefrom until a new certificate of compliance has been issued by the board. It shall be unlawful for the owner or operator of any well to produce oil or gas therefrom (except as to a temporary connection as hereinabove provided), unless there is in effect a certificate of compliance covering such well.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-31; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 17.

§ 53-3-17.
Illegal transactions.

The sale, purchase, or acquisition, or the transportation, refining, processing, or handling in any other way of illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product is hereby prohibited.

Unless and until the state oil and gas board provides for certificates of clearance, or some other method, so that any person may have an opportunity to determine whether any contemplated transaction of sale, purchase, or acquisition, or of transportation, refining, processing, or handling in any other way, involves illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product, no penalty shall be imposed for the sale, purchase or acquisition, or the transportation, refining, processing, or handling in any other way, of illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product, except under circumstances hereinafter stated. Penalties shall be imposed by the board for each transaction prohibited in this section when the person committing the same knows that illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product is involved in such transaction or when such person could have known or determined such fact by the exercise of reasonable diligence or from facts within his knowledge. However, regardless of lack of actual notice or knowledge, penalties as provided in Section 53-1-47 shall apply to any sale, purchase, or acquisition, and to the transportation, refining, processing, or handling in any other way, without a certificate of clearance, of illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product, where administrative provision is made for identifying the character of the commodity as to its legality. It shall likewise be a violation for which penalties shall be imposed for any person to sell, purchase, or acquire, or to transport, refine, process, or handle in any other way any oil, gas or any product without complying with any rule, regulation, or order of the board relating thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-32; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 18.